Hawaii statutes.
§121-8 Adjutant general; rank, salary.
The adjutant general shall have the grade of a general officer. The salary of
the adjutant general shall be subject to section 26-52. [L 1967, c 196, pt of
§1; HRS §121-8; am L 1982, c 129, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next